dictionaries/hy/src/hy_AM.aff
FLAG long
# ոջ նու
SFX G8 	Y 6
SFX G8  0	ոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8	ույր	րոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8	ին	նոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8	ին	նու/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8  ուր	րոջ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G8  տեր	տիրոջ/DEABINLO	.

# ման
SFX G9 	Y 1
SFX G9  ում	ման/DE	.	

# ուայ
SFX GA Y 4
SFX GA  0       վա    .
SFX GA  0       վաս   .
SFX GA  0       վադ   .
SFX GA  0       վան/ABINLO     .

# ուայ  շաբթի
SFX GC Y 4
SFX GC	ի	վա	.
SFX GC	ի	վաս	.
SFX GC	ի	վադ	.
SFX GC	ի	վան/ABINLO	.

# ան  լեռան
SFX GD Y 4
SFX GD	0	ան/DE	.
SFX GD	ուն	ան/DE	.
SFX GD	ուն	նան/DE	.
SFX GD	ուկ	կան/DE	.

# genitive
SFX GE Y 5
SFX GE	0	ի	.
SFX GE	0	իս	.
SFX GE 	0	իդ	.
SFX GE 	0	ին       .
SFX GE  իկ	կի/DE	.

# gent
SFX GX  Y   55 
SFX GX  իկ      կի/DE	.
SFX GX  ուկ     կի/DE	.
SFX GX  ումբ    մբի/DE	.
SFX GX  ունդ    նդի/DE	.
SFX GX  ուրդ    րդի/DE	.
SFX GX  իզբ     զբի/DE	.
SFX GX  իթ      թի/DE	.
SFX GX  ուզ     զի/DE 	.
SFX GX  ուղթ    ղթի/DE	.
SFX GX իժ               ժի/DE  .
SFX GX իծ               ծի/DE .
SFX GX ուծ              ծի/DE .
SFX GX ուխ              խի/DE  .
SFX GX ունկ             նկի/DE . 
SFX GX ունձ             նձի/DE .
SFX GX ուրձ             րձի/DE .
SFX GX ինձ              նձի/DE .
SFX GX իղ               ղի/DE .
SFX GX իճ               ճի/DE .
SFX GX ին		նի/DE .
SFX GX ուն		նի/DE .
SFX GX իշ		շի/DE .
SFX GX ուշ		շի/DE .
SFX GX ու		վի/DE .
SFX GX ունչ		նչի/DE .
SFX GX ինջ		նջի/DE .
SFX GX ունջ		նջի/DE .
SFX GX իսպ		սպի/DE .
SFX GX իս		սի/DE .
SFX GX ուրջ		րջի/DE  .
SFX GX իչ		չի/DE .
SFX GX իջ		ջի/DE .
SFX GX իռ		ռի/DE .
SFX GX ուռ		ռի/DE .
SFX GX իտ		տի/DE .
SFX GX ուտ		տի/DE .
SFX GX իվ		վի/DE .
SFX GX իր		րի/DE .
SFX GX ուր		րի/DE .
SFX GX իշտ		շտի/DE .
SFX GX իստ		ստի/DE .
SFX GX ուշտ		շտի/DE .
SFX GX իրտ		րտի/DE .
SFX GX ուրտ		րտի/DE .
SFX GX ից		ցի/DE .
SFX GX ուց		ցի/DE .
SFX GX իտք		տքի/DE .
SFX GX ուտք		տքի/DE .
SFX GX իրք		րքի/DE .
SFX GX ինք		նքի/DE .
SFX GX ինդ		նդի/DE .
SFX GX ուփ		փի/DE .
SFX GX ուք		քի/DE . 
SFX GX ա		ի/DE . 
SFX GX դուռ		դռան/DE .

#present
SFX	VA	Y 25
SFX	VA	լ	մ/CH	.
SFX	VA	լ	ս/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	ի/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ա/CH	.
SFX	VA	լ	նք/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	աք/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	եք/CH	.
SFX	VA	լ	ն/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	եի/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	եիր/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	եր/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	եինք/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	եիք/CH	.
SFX	VA	ել	եին/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այի/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այիր/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ար/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այինք/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այիք/CH	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ային/CH	.
SFX	VA	լ	լիս	.
SFX	VA	լ	լիք/CHDEGEABINLOPP	.
SFX	VA	լ	լի/CHDEGEABINLOPP	.
SFX	VA	ել	ում	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ում	.

# ալ - ել  verb class specific
SFX	VB	Y 	117
SFX	VB	ել	ող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	վող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	վողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ված/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	վածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցված/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացել .
SFX	VB	ել	եցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացվել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VB	ել	եցրել .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրել .
SFX	VB	ել	իր .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ա .
SFX	VB	ել	եցեք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացեք .
SFX	VB	ել	վիր .	
SFX	VB	ել	ցվիր .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցեք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացվեցեք .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրեք .
SFX	VB	ել	եցրու .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրու .
SFX	VB	ել	եցրեք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրեք .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցներ	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեմ/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնես/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնենք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեն/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցներ/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեինք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեիք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեին/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեց/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցինք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցիք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցին/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրինք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրիք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրին/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VB	ել	վելիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվելիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	լով	.
SFX	VB	լ	լիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվում	.
SFX	VB	ել	վում	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնում	.
SFX	VB	լ	ր	.
SFX	VB	ել	վել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեմ/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վես/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վի/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վենք/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեք/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեն/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեր .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեմ/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվես/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվենք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեն/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեի/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեր/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեինք/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեիք/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեին/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեինք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեիք/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեին/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ց/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցին/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեց/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցին/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեց/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցին/CH .

#nal ուշացայ մօտեցայ
SFX	VC	Y	86
SFX	VC	նալ	ցա/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցար/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցավ/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցանք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցաք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցան/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվել/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեմ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվես/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվենք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեն/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցված/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցել .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրել .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցիր .	
SFX	VC	նալ	նա .	
SFX	VC	նալ	նար .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցեք .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվիր .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցեք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցեք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրու .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցեք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցներ	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեմ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնես/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնենք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեն/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեիր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցներ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեինք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեիք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեին/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեց/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցինք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցիք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցին/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրիր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրինք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրիք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրին/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվելիս	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվում	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնում	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեր .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեմ/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվես/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվենք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեն/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեիր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեինք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեիք/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեին/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեց/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցինք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցիք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցին/CH .
