dictionaries/hy/src/hy_AM.dic
աղոթատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
ամառ/DEINGAGEPP
ամառանոցատեր/DEG8PM
ամսական/DEABGEINLOPP
այգետունկ/DEPMAXGXIXLX
այսօր/DEAAGAINLOPMGEAB
անառակատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
անասնանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
աներևութանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
անհամապատասխան/DEABGEINLOPP
անձնանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
անպատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
անսիրտ/DEAXGXIXLXPX
աշխատընկեր/DEABGEINLOG8PP
աշխատօր/DEAAGAINLOPMGEAB
աշտանակ/DEABGEINLOPP
ապակել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ապառաժանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
առաջ/DEABGAGEPP
առողջացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ավազաբլուր/DEGXAXIXLXPP
ավանդատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
արդուզարդ/DEABGEINLOPM
արծնապատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
արտանկարվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
արտատեր/DEPMG8
բազմախորհուրդ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
բազմել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բաղատեր/DEPMG8
բաղկանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
բանաքննական/DEABGEINLOPP
բեկում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
բիր/DEAXGXIXLXPM
բողբոջել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բոռբռալ/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բոստանատեր/DEPMG8
բրնձացանք/DEABGEINLOPP
գազանանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
գանձատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
գառ/DEPXAXGXIXLX
գառնատեր/DEG8PM
գերագնահատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
գերմակել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
գժատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
գինեվաճառ/DEABGEINLOPP
գծգծել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
գոլորշիանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
գոմատեր/DEPMG8
գոնչագլուխ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
գրավատեր/DEG8PM
գունագեղել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
գունավիմագիր/DEGDAXLXIXPX
դանդաղում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
դառնադաժան/DEABGEINLOPP
դափնեզարդել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
դեսպանախորհուրդ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
դյուրանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
դպրատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
դրամատեր/DEG8PM
դրմբացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
եկամտաշատ/DEABGEINLO
ետամառ/DEINGAGEPP
ետնակին/DEG8PP
երգակից/DEAXGXIXLXPP
երեկ/DEAAGAINLOPMGEAB
երեսակում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
երեքշաբթի/DEGCACINLOPP
երկուշաբթի/DEGCACINLOPP
եփել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
զգայազեղ/DEABGEINLO
զեկուցվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
զվարճանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
զուգընկեր/DEABGEINLOG8PP
էջախորագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPX
էտում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
ընդհատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
թախանձել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
թակել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
թասընկեր/DEABGEINLOG8PP
թեթև/CCDEABGEINLOPP
թոռանթոռ/DEGDABINLOPP
թռվռալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
թրաշում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
թույլատրվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ժամ/DEAAGAINLOPMGEAB
ժամանակագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPX
ժառանգազրկվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ինքնատուրք/DEABGEINLOPM
լողախուց/DEAXGXIXLXPX
լողարկում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
լպիրշանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
լսվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
լուծընկեր/DEABGEINLOG8PP
լուսատարի/DEA2ACG2GCI2L2PP
լուսնագիշեր/DEAAGAINLOPPGEA1
խաղավարտ/DEABGEINLOPP
խառնել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
խխել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
խմբագրատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
խնձորաջուր/DEGXAXIXLXPX
խորանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
խստասրտել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
խտացում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
խրամապատ/DEABGEINLOPP
խունացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
ծիրանածին/DEAXGXIXLXPP
ծրել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կաթնաքույր/DEPMG8
կալանատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
կաղապարում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
կապուտանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
կարգագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPX
կենտ/DEABGEINLOPM
կենտրոնացվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կինոձեռնարկատեր/DEG8PM
կիրակի/DEGCACINLOPP
կլայեկում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
կոտորակվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կորագլուխ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
կրակատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
կրծել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կուլտուրականանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
հակավորում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հայաշխարհ/DEABGEINLOPP
հայցատեր/DEG8PM
հաշմվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հաշվետարի/DEA2ACG2GCI2L2PP
հավելում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հատկանշել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հարթանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
հարկադիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
հեռախոսագիծ/DEGDAXLXIXPX
հյուրասիրվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հնչում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հողատեր/DEG8PP
հորատում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հորթատեր/DEG8PM
հրաշամանուկ/DEGDABINLOPP
հուռանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ձմեռ/DEINGAGEPP
ճահճանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ճաշընկեր/DEABGEINLOG8PP
ճարել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ճարպակալում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
մածուն/DEPPAXGXIXLX
մահ/DEABGEGAINLO
մանկատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
մանրանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
մարզում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
մերձավորել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
միլիցիատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
մխում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
մտասուզվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
մտերմանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
մուրհակատեր/DEG8PM
նախաբազուկ/DEAXGXIXLXPP
ներխուժել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ներքաղաքական/DEABGEINLOPP
նկարահանում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
շաբաթ/DEGAINLOPP
շաբաթօր/DEAAGAINLOPMGEAB
շերեփաձուկ/DEGDPX
շիջանել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
շնորհազարդել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
շոգիանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
շպարում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
ոսկեձուկ/DEGDPX
որդեծին/DEAXGXIXLXPP
որմապատել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
չափափորձում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
չորեքշաբթի/DEGCACINLOPP
պանրանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
պաշտպանում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
պատարագել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
պարկամուկ/DEGDPX
պարտատեր/DEG8PM
ջոլիր/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
ջրանկարիչ/DEAXGXIXLXPP
ջրիկանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ջրմուկ/DEGDPX
ջրջրհանվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ռադիոընդունիչ/DEABGEINLOPP
սառցապատել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
սեղանատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
սիստեմավորում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
ստացվածատեր/DEG8PM
ստերջանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
սրտագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPX
սրտամկան/DEABGEINLOPP
վաղ/AACCGAINDE
վաճառատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
վարսվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
վեհացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
վերջանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
վիժում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
տարի/DEGCGEPP
տզվզալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
տզտզալ/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
տիկին/DEG8PP
տորֆահանք/DEABGEINLOPM
տպագրատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
ցաթել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ցնծագին/DEPXAXGXIXLX
ուլատեր/DEG8PM
ուրբաթ/DEAAGAINLOPMGE
ուրվականանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
փարավոնամուկ/DEGDPX
փոթփոթուն/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
փողփողուն/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
քաջվարդ/DEABGEINLOPM
քերքեշակալել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
քույր/DEPMG8
քուրդ/DEAXGXIXLXPX
